Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 17
DEPARTMENT OF WATER RESOURCES — WATER RESOURCE BOARD

Sec.

§ 42-1701. Creation of department of water resources — Director — Qualifications — Duties.

There is hereby created the department of water resources, which shall, for the purposes of section 20, article IV, of the constitution of the state of Idaho, be an executive department of the state government.

The executive and administrative authority of the department, except such authority as is specifically assigned by law to the water resource board, shall be vested in a director of the department of water resources who shall be: a licensed civil or agricultural engineer with not less than five (5) years of experience in the active practice of such profession; a registered geologist with not less than five (5) years of experience in the active practice of hydrology; or a hydrologist holding a bachelor’s or advanced degree in hydrology from a college or university accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting organization and with not less than five (5) years of experience in surface water and ground water modeling, water delivery and water measurement. The director of the department of water resources shall also demonstrate experience and expertise in interpreting and applying Idaho water law and shall be familiar with irrigation and other water use practices in Idaho.

The director may delegate such duties as are imposed upon him by law to an employee of the department of water resources whenever in the opinion of the director, such delegation is necessary for the efficient administration of his duties.

The director shall organize the department into such divisions and other administrative subunits as may be necessary in order to efficiently administer the department. All employees of the department, except the director, shall be selected and appointed by the director in conformance with the provisions of chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code.

The director and/or employees of the department of water resources may make reasonable entry upon any lands in the state for the purpose of making investigations and surveys, or for other purposes necessary to carry out the duties imposed by law.

Any authorization or order of the Idaho public utilities commission, under the provisions of section 61-328, Idaho Code, approving the sale, assignment or transfer of hydropower water rights used in the generation of electric power shall be issued only upon such conditions as the director of the department of water resources shall require as necessary to prevent any change in use of water under the water rights held for hydropower purposes that would cause injury to any water rights existing on the date of the sale, assignment or transfer. Any such conditions shall ensure that the public interest, as it pertains to the use of water under the hydropower water rights, will not be adversely affected. Conditions, if any, imposed by the director shall be subject to review under section 42-1701A(4), Idaho Code.
(6)(a) Any authorization or order of the Idaho public utilities commission, under the provisions of section 61-328, Idaho Code, approving the sale, assignment or transfer of hydropower water rights used in the generation of electric power shall be issued only upon such conditions as the director of the department of water resources shall require as necessary to prevent any change in use of water under the water rights held for hydropower purposes that would cause injury to any water rights existing on the date of the sale, assignment or transfer. Any such conditions shall ensure that the public interest, as it pertains to the use of water under the hydropower water rights, will not be adversely affected. Conditions, if any, imposed by the director shall be subject to review under section 42-1701A(4), Idaho Code.

Subsection (6)(a) of this section may be satisfied by a written agreement between the holder of a water right held for hydropower purposes and the governor, which agreement has been ratified by the legislature of the state of Idaho. The agreement between the governor and the Idaho power company dated October 15, 1984, and ratified by the legislature of the state of Idaho pursuant to section 42-203B, Idaho Code, and the subordination provisions relating to the Idaho power company’s water rights satisfy subsection (6)(a) of this section.

§ 42-1701A. Hearings before director — Appeals.

All hearings required by law to be held before the director of the department of water resources shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and rules of procedure promulgated by the director.

The director, in his discretion, may direct that a hearing be conducted by a hearing officer appointed by the director. In such event, the hearing officer shall have the duty to make a complete record of the evidence presented and duly received at the hearing and to prepare a recommended or preliminary order in accordance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and rules of procedure promulgated by the director.

Unless the right to a hearing before the director or the water resource board is otherwise provided by statute, any person aggrieved by any action of the director, including any decision, determination, order or other action, including action upon any application for a permit, license, certificate, approval, registration, or similar form of permission required by law to be issued by the director, who is aggrieved by the action of the director, and who has not previously been afforded an opportunity for a hearing on the matter shall be entitled to a hearing before the director to contest the action. The person shall file with the director, within fifteen (15) days after receipt of written notice of the action issued by the director, or receipt of actual notice, a written petition stating the grounds for contesting the action by the director and requesting a hearing. The director shall give such notice of the petition as is necessary to provide other affected persons an opportunity to participate in the proceeding. The hearing shall be held and conducted in accordance with the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section. Judicial review of any final order of the director issued following the hearing shall be had pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

Any person who is aggrieved by a final decision or order of the director is entitled to judicial review. The judicial review shall be had in accordance with the provisions and standards set forth in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

Section 6 of S.L. 1994, ch. 450 declared an emergency and provided that this act shall apply to all calls for distribution of water pending at the time of passage and approval. Approved April 11, 1994.
CASE NOTES

§ 42-1701B. Enforcement procedure — Notice — Consent order — Civil action.

Authority to commence actions. The director of the department of water resources is authorized and may commence and pursue enforcement actions to remedy the designated violations set out in title 42, Idaho Code.

Notice. When the director commences an administrative enforcement action the notice of violation shall be served upon the alleged violator in person or by certified mail. The notice of violation shall identify the alleged violation and shall specify each provision of the designated chapter, rule, permit, condition of approval or order which has been violated. The notice of violation shall state the remedy, including any demand to cease and desist, restoration and mitigation measures, and the amount of any civil penalty the director seeks for redress of the violation. Factors the director may consider in seeking the appropriate remedy include the impact of the violation and whether the violation was willful, a repeat violation for which the violator had been given a prior written warning, or the violator has otherwise refused to comply with the department’s lawful directives. The notice of violation shall inform the person to whom it is directed of an opportunity to confer with the director or the director’s designee in a compliance conference concerning the alleged violation.

Response. A written response may be required within fourteen (14) days of the receipt of the notice of violation by the person to whom it is directed. If a recipient of a notice of violation contacts the department within fourteen (14) days of the receipt of the notice, the recipient shall be entitled to a compliance conference. The conference shall be held within twenty-one (21) days of the receipt of the notice unless a later date is agreed upon between the parties. If a compliance conference is not requested, the director may proceed with a civil enforcement action as provided in this section.

Compliance conference and consent order. The compliance conference shall provide an opportunity for the recipient of a notice of violation to explain the circumstance of the alleged violation and, where appropriate, to present a proposal for remedying the damage caused by the violation and assuring future compliance. If the recipient and the director agree on a plan to remedy damage caused by the alleged violation and to assure future compliance, they may enter into a consent order formalizing their agreement. The consent order may include a provision providing for payment of any agreed civil penalty. The consent order shall be effective immediately upon signing by both parties and shall preclude a civil enforcement action for the same alleged violation. If a party does not comply with the terms of the consent order, the director may seek and obtain in any appropriate district court, specific performance of the consent order and other relief as authorized by law. If the parties cannot agree to a consent order within fifty-six (56) days after the receipt of the notice of violation, or if the recipient does not request a compliance conference, the director may commence and prosecute a civil enforcement action in the district court in accordance with this section.

Civil enforcement actions.

The director may initiate a civil enforcement action through the attorney general as provided in this section. Civil enforcement actions shall be commenced and prosecuted in the district court in and for the county in which the alleged violation occurred, and may be brought against any person who is alleged to have substantially violated any provision of title 42, Idaho Code, or any rule promulgated pursuant to that title. The action may be brought to compel compliance with provisions of title 42, Idaho Code, or rules promulgated pursuant to that title. The director shall not be required to prosecute an administrative enforcement action before initiating a civil enforcement action.

Nothing in this section shall preclude employees of the department designated by the director from issuing Idaho uniform citations or written administrative orders directing persons to cease and desist as authorized by law.

If the person who is the subject of the notice of violation fails to cease and desist the activity or activities constituting the alleged violation within the time limits set in the notice of violation, the director may seek, by and through the attorney general, injunctive relief in the district court pending the outcome of the administrative enforcement action.

In an action brought against a person for diverting water without having obtained a valid water right to do so, the director need not allege or prove that irreparable injury to the state or to other water users will occur should the preliminary injunction not be issued or that the remedy at law is inadequate, and the preliminary injunction or permanent injunction shall issue without those allegations and without that proof.

Penalties.

Any person determined in a judicial civil enforcement action to have substantially violated any designated provision of title 42, Idaho Code, or any rule promulgated pursuant to that title, shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation or one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per day for a continuing violation, whichever is greater; except that persons determined to be in violation of section 42-351, Idaho Code, shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed:

For nonirrigation uses, fifty dollars ($50.00) per one-tenth (0.1) cubic feet per second of water or part thereof diverted per calendar day, or fifty dollars ($50.00) per two tenths (0.2) of an acre foot of water or part thereof diverted to storage, up to a maximum penalty of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per year for water illegally used or diverted;

For irrigation uses, three hundred dollars ($300) annually for each acre irrigated, in whole or in part, by the illegal use or diversion.

Civil penalties shall not be assessed for violations that have occurred more than twelve (12) months prior to the issuance of the notice of violation. The court shall determine the amount of the penalty based upon the willfulness of the violation, the economic value obtained by the violator and the damage to public resources and other water right holders. A method of recovery of the penalty shall be a civil enforcement action in and for the county where the violation occurred.

All civil penalties collected under this section shall be paid into the water right[s] enforcement account established pursuant to section 42-1778, Idaho Code.

Parties to an administrative enforcement action may agree to a civil penalty as provided in this subsection.

No action taken pursuant to this section shall relieve any person from any civil liability and damages that may exist for injury or damage resulting to others.

Upon request of the director, it shall be the duty of the attorney general to institute and prosecute civil enforcement actions pursuant to this section.

§ 42-1702. Duty to supply information.

The director shall, free of charge, give any information desired by any person as to the proper method of measuring water, or of constructing an apparatus for such measurement, upon proper application being made; and shall give special instructions to all watermasters as to measurement of water so as to secure a just distribution of the same.

§ 42-1703. Attorney general to advise director.

The director may require, and shall receive, from the attorney general of the state, advice upon any question of public interest arising in the performance of duties under this chapter, which advice shall be in writing when so desired. The director may employ counsel or may retain private counsel.

§ 42-1704. Director to make report.

The director shall make and render to the governor, annually, or oftener, if required, full and true reports of the work performed by the department, which reports shall contain any recommendations he may have to make in reference to legislation affecting the department.

§ 42-1705. Cooperation with United States geological survey.

The director of the department of water resources is hereby authorized to cooperate with the United States geological survey in the investigation of the water resources and gauging the flow of the streams of the state of Idaho so long as the federal government is engaged in making such measurements and surveys. To that end he is hereby authorized to make the necessary contract or contracts with the director of the United States geological survey whereby a part of the expenses incurred in the making of such surveys, gaugings and measurements may be paid by the state of Idaho, to an amount not to exceed the appropriation hereinafter made. Said contract or contracts shall provide among other things, that the United States geological survey shall furnish to the department of water resources complete and detailed reports of the results obtained by said survey, gaugings and measurements and copies of such original records, plats, notes and other data as shall be required by the department. Such reports, plats, notes, records and data shall be and become a part of the permanent records of the office of the department. All claims for expenses incurred or made hereunder shall be filed, examined, and when allowed, paid out of the state treasury in the same manner that other claims against the state are made, filed, examined and paid.

§ 42-1706. Additional duties of director.

The director of the department of water resources shall make or cause to be made careful measurements of the flow in cubic feet per second of the various streams in the state whose waters are, or are likely to be, appropriated and used, through that part of the season which he may deem necessary or expedient, to afford information for irrigating purposes, commencing with those streams most used for irrigation. The director shall collect facts and make surveys to ascertain suitable locations for reservoirs upon streams where such reservoirs may be possible and beneficial, and shall, as far as possible, determine the cost of constructing such reservoirs, and all other facts possible in regard to quantity of water possible to be stored, the character and extent of land that may be reclaimed by the water from such reservoirs, together with all other information possible that may bear upon the subject. The director shall become familiar with the waterways and irrigable land in the state and the needs of the state as to irrigation matters, and all records of any such information shall be the property of the state and open to public inspection. The director shall keep full and complete records of all measurements of streams, surveys, examinations or other valuable information that may come into his possession concerning any of the duties of the department, and shall furnish reasonable information in regard to such measurements or surveys to the newspapers of the state upon proper request.

In addition to the duties prescribed in this chapter, the director shall perform such other professional duties as may be required of him by the governor, and shall give advice on any matters of a professional nature, when called upon by the governor to do so.

§ 42-1707, 42-1708. Examination of plans for dams — Inspection of dams. [Repealed.]

§ 42-1709. Inspection and oversight on complaint or director’s determination.

If any person or persons shall report in writing to the director that any dam, artificial barrier or embankment that stores or impounds water, except for those excluded in section 42-1711(b)(1) through (4), Idaho Code, or mine tailings impoundment structure used for storing tailings slurry is unsafe and endangering life or property, then it shall be the duty of the director to inspect, or cause to be inspected, such dam, artificial barrier or embankment or mine tailings impoundment structure as soon as possible, and, if he considers it unsafe, to proceed as provided in this chapter.

If the director determines that the failure of any artificial barrier or embankment that stores or impounds water, except for those excluded in section 42-1711(b)(1) through (4), Idaho Code, would pose a threat of direct loss of life or significant property damage, the director shall regularly inspect and regulate it as a dam as provided in this chapter.

§ 42-1710. Intent of legislature — Construction, maintenance and operation of dams and mine tailings impoundment structures.

It is the intent of the legislature by this act to provide for the regulation of construction, maintenance and operation of all dams, reservoirs and mine tailings impoundment structures exclusively by the state to the extent required for the protection of public safety. All dams, reservoirs and mine tailings impoundment structures in the state are under jurisdiction of the department of water resources. The department of water resources, under the police power of the state, shall supervise the construction, enlargement, alteration, repair, maintenance, operation and removal of dams, reservoirs and mine tailings impoundment structures for the protection of life and property. The department of water resources may enter into agreements with other state agencies having jurisdiction over water storage structures to limit duplication of inspection, review and regulation of such structures.

§ 42-1711. Definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this chapter.

“Department” means the department of water resources.

“Dam” means any artificial barrier or embankment, together with appurtenant works, constructed for the purpose of storing water or that stores water, which is ten (10) feet or more in height from the natural bed of the stream or watercourse at the downstream toe of the barrier, as determined by the department, or from the lowest elevation of the outside limit of the barrier, if it is not across a stream channel or watercourse, to the maximum water storage elevation, and has or will have an impounding capacity at maximum water storage elevation of fifty (50) acre-feet or more. The following are not included as regulated dams or are not considered dams for the purposes of sections 42-1710 through 42-1721, Idaho Code:

Barriers in a canal used to raise or lower water therein or divert water therefrom.

Fills or structures determined by the director to be designed primarily for highway or railroad traffic.

Fills, retaining dikes or structures less than twenty (20) feet in height, which are under jurisdiction of the department of environmental quality or the department of agriculture, determined by the director of the department of water resources to be designed primarily for retention or treatment of municipal, livestock, or domestic wastes, or sediment and wastes from produce washing or food processing plants.

Levees that store water regardless of storage capacity.

“Levee” means a retaining structure alongside a natural lake which has a length that is two hundred (200) times or more greater than its greatest height measured from the lowest elevation of the toe to the maximum crest elevation of the retaining structure.

“Reservoir” means any basin which contains or will contain the water impounded by a dam.

“Owner” includes any of the following who own, control, operate, maintain, manage, or propose to construct a dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure:

The state of Idaho and its departments, agencies, institutions and political subdivisions;

The United States of America and any of its departments, bureaus, agencies and institutions; provided that the United States of America shall not be required to pay any of the fees required by section 42-1713, Idaho Code, and shall submit plans, drawings and specifications as required by section 42-1712, Idaho Code, for information purposes only;

Every municipal or quasi-municipal corporation;

Every public utility;

Every person, firm, association, organization, partnership, business trust, corporation or company;

The duly authorized agents, lessees, or trustees of any of the foregoing; or

Receivers or trustees appointed by any court for any of the foregoing.

“Alterations,” “repairs,” or either of them, mean only such alterations or repairs as may directly affect the safety of the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure, as determined by the department.

“Enlargement” means any change in or addition to an existing dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure, which raises or may raise the water storage elevation of the water impounded by the dam or mine tailings slurry impounded by the mine tailings impoundment structure.

“Maximum water storage elevation” means the maximum design elevation of water surface which can be impounded by the dam or reservoir.

“Storage capacity” means the total volume of storage at the maximum water storage elevation.

“Days” used in establishing deadlines means calendar days including Sundays and holidays.

“Certificate of approval” means a certificate issued by the director for all dams or mine tailings impoundment structures listing restrictions imposed by the director, and without which no new dams shall be allowed to impound water or mine tailings impoundment structures shall be allowed to impound mine tailings slurry.

“Mine tailings impoundment structure” means any artificial embankment which is or will be more than thirty (30) feet in height measured from the lowest elevation of the toe to the maximum crest elevation constructed for the purpose of storing mine tailings slurry.

“Lift construction” means mine tailings impoundment structure enlargement by raising the elevation of the structure on a continuous or recurring basis. Such practice will be considered under construction until the structure reaches its final crest elevation.

“Mine tailings impoundment elevation” means the maximum elevation of stored mine tailings which can be obtained by the impounding structure.

“Mine tailings slurry” means all slurry wastes from a mineral processing or mining operation.

“Mine tailings storage capacity” means the total storage volume of the impounding area when filled with tailings to the maximum designed storage elevation.

“Hazard” means the potential consequences to downstream life and property resulting from a dam failure and uncontrolled release of water, exclusive of the size or the physical condition of the dam or mine tailings impoundment structure. Hazard classifications shall be assigned to new and existing dams or mine tailings impoundment structures based on the severity of failure consequences to life and property.

“Professional engineer” means a person who has been duly licensed as a professional engineer by the Idaho board of licensure of professional engineers and professional land surveyors under chapter 12, title 54, Idaho Code.

“Artificial barrier or embankment” means any structure constructed to impede or obstruct the flow of water.

§ 42-1712. Construction, enlargement, alteration or repair of dams — Submission of duplicate plans, drawings and specifications.

Owners who shall desire to construct, or enlarge, or alter or repair, meaning only such alterations or repairs as may affect the safety of the dam or reservoir, any dam, for the purpose of storing or appropriating or diverting any of the waters of this state, when the same is to be ten (10) feet or more in height and having a storage capacity of fifty (50) acre-feet or more, except as otherwise in this chapter provided, shall submit duplicate plans, drawings and specifications of the proposed work to the director, and construction of a new dam or enlargement, or alteration or repairs shall not be commenced until the owner has applied for and obtained written approval of the plans, drawings and specifications.

Owners of dams under construction on the effective date of this legislation and for which plans, drawings and specifications are required but have not been approved on or before the effective date of this legislation shall submit such plans, drawings and specifications for approval, with the fee established hereinafter. The director shall give notice to owners to submit plans, drawings and specifications, and failure to submit plans, drawings and specifications for approval within thirty (30) days of the date of mailing the notice shall be punishable as provided in this act, and construction shall be stopped upon issuance of an order by the director unless for good cause shown as determined by the director further time is allowed. The notice and/or order provided for in this paragraph may be given by certified mail and a return receipt signed by the owner or responsible company shall constitute prima facie evidence of service.

Upon receipt of the plans, drawings and specifications, the director shall give consideration thereto and shall approve or disapprove the same within the time provided in this section, and if he approves them, the director shall affix his approval thereto and return one (1) copy of each such plans, drawings and specifications, with his approval, to the party or parties proposing to construct the works.

Plans, drawings and specifications submitted to the director complete with fees shall be approved or disapproved in no more than sixty (60) days and in no less than fourteen (14) days after receipt. Defective plans, drawings and specifications made in a bona fide attempt to conform to the law and rules of the water resource board shall not be rejected but notice of defect shall be sent to the owner by certified mail. If within thirty (30) days of the date of mailing the notice the owner does not file amended and perfected plans, drawings and specifications, the plans, drawings and specifications shall be rejected and canceled unless for good cause shown the director allows the owner further time.

The construction of all dams under plans, drawings and specifications approved by the director shall be pursued with reasonable diligence to completion. In the event that an owner fails to commence actual construction and maintain reasonable construction progress of the dam under the plans, drawings and specifications approved by the director prior to or after the effective date of this act, such approval may be voided by the director one (1) year after such approval. Notice of the intent to void any such approval shall be sent by the director to the owner by certified mail and said owner shall be allowed thirty (30) days within which to show cause why such approval should not be voided. The director may grant additional time within which to commence the construction under plans, drawings and specifications approved by the director upon a showing of reasonable cause. Plans, drawings and specifications for which approval has become void must be resubmitted for approval, with the fee therefor as hereafter provided, prior to commencing construction of any such dam.
The plans, drawings and specifications shall include the following information:

The name and address of the owner.

The location, type, size and height of the proposed dam or reservoir and appurtenant works.

The storage capacity of the reservoir.

Such other pertinent information as the director may require including the following:

Data concerning subsoil and foundation conditions and materials entering into construction of the dam or reservoir.

Investigations of, and reports on subsurface conditions involving such matters as exploratory pits, trenches, and adits, drilling, coring, geophysical surveys, tests to determine leakage rates, and physical tests to measure in place the properties and behavior of foundation materials at the dam or reservoir site.

Investigation of and reports on the geology of the dam or reservoir site and its vicinity, possible geological hazards, availability and quality of construction materials, and other pertinent factors.

The plans, drawings and specifications shall be of such character and size setting forth such pertinent details and dimensions and in such form as the director requires. Plans, drawings and specifications which are submitted to the department shall be prepared by or under the direction of a professional engineer and authenticated by him as provided in section 54-1215, Idaho Code.

Where said dam is, in the opinion of the director, not of sufficient importance to have the provisions of the section apply to such dam, then the director shall have power, upon written application, to suspend the provisions of this section in regard to such dam.

The director shall prepare design and construction criteria for artificial barriers or embankments that store water, that are not dams as defined in this chapter, and shall supply such criteria upon request to any interested person to aid in constructing such artificial barriers or embankments. The use of such criteria shall in no way relieve the owner of responsibility for adequacy of design and construction procedures, nor be the basis of liability for any city or county that grants a permit related to construction of the artificial barrier or embankment pursuant to the provisions of chapter 65, title 67, Idaho Code.

§ 42-1713. Fees.

Fees provided for in this chapter shall be required of all enumerated in the definition of owner. Fees for an enlargement to an existing dam or mine tailings impoundment structure shall be based upon the increase in storage capacity or tailings storage capacity. Fees for alterations or repairs of an existing dam or mine tailings impoundment structure shall be based on an estimate, made by the director, of costs of inspections to be made, however, in no case shall such fees exceed that which would be required by the fee schedule for construction of the dam or mine tailings impoundment structure.

The fee for construction of a dam or mine tailings impoundment structure, or for enlarging an existing dam or mine tailings impoundment structure, shall be two hundred dollars ($200) plus the following amount:

For one thousand (1,000) acre-feet capacity or less, ten dollars ($10.00) for each ten (10) acre-feet or part thereof.

For over one thousand (1,000) acre-feet capacity but not exceeding ten thousand (10,000) acre-feet capacity, one thousand dollars ($1,000) plus one dollar ($1.00) for each ten (10) acre-feet or part thereof over the first one thousand (1,000) acre-feet capacity.

For storage in excess of ten thousand (10,000) acre-feet, one thousand nine hundred dollars ($1,900) plus twenty cents (20¢) for each ten (10) acre-feet or part thereof over the first ten thousand (10,000) acre-feet capacity. In no case, however, shall the fee be more than six thousand dollars ($6,000).

All plans, drawings and specifications shall not be considered by the department until the filing fee is received. All moneys received by the department under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited in the water administration fund [account] created under section 42-238a, Idaho Code, and shall be available to the department in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. Fees submitted shall not be refunded.

§ 42-1714. Rules.

The water resource board shall adopt and revise from time to time such rules as may be necessary for carrying out the provisions of sections 42-1710 through 42-1721, Idaho Code. The rules governing mine tailings and impoundment structures shall require the owner to provide an abandonment plan to assure that the site will be in a safe maintenance-free condition upon completion of the mining operation. The rules shall also require the owner to provide to the director a bond or other acceptable surety adequate to complete the abandonment plan if the owner abandons the site without conforming to the plan. The amount of the bond shall be determined by the director and shall be established to avoid duplication with sureties deposited with other governmental agencies. In lieu of any surety required hereunder, the owner may deposit cash and governmental securities with the director in an amount equal to that of the required surety on conditions as prescribed in the rules.

§ 42-1715. Inspection during construction, enlargement, alteration, repair or removal of dams and mine tailings impoundment structures — Effect of noncompliance.

During the construction, enlargement, repair, alteration, or removal of any dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure, the director shall make or cause to have made continuous or periodical inspections at state expense for the purpose of securing conformity with the approved plans and specifications, but shall require the owner to perform at his expense such work or tests as necessary to disclose information sufficient to enable him to determine that conformity with the approved plans and specifications is being secured, which shall include adequate inspection, at owner’s expense to verify compliance with approved plans, drawings and specifications.

The work of construction, enlargement, repair, alteration or removal of a dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure, for which approved plans, drawings and specifications are required, shall be under the responsible charge of a professional engineer who shall certify that such construction, enlargement, repair, alteration or removal was done in accordance with approved plans, drawings and specifications. If, after any inspections, investigations or examinations, or at any time as the work progresses, or at any time prior to issuance of a certificate of approval, it is found by the director that amendments, modifications or changes are necessary to insure safety, the director may order the owner to revise the plans and specifications. If conditions are revealed which will not permit the construction of a safe dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure, the approval may be revoked. In the event that conditions imposed may be waived or made less burdensome without sacrificing a proper margin of safety, the director may authorize an owner to revise the plans and specifications accordingly. If at any time during construction, enlargement, repair or alterations [alteration] of any dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure the director finds that the work is not being done in accordance with the provision of the approval and the approved plans and specifications, he shall give a written notice and order by certified mail or by personal service to the owner. The notice and order shall state the particulars in which the approval and approved plans and specifications or the approval and approved plans and specifications as revised are not being or have not been complied with and shall order the immediate compliance with the approval and approved revised plans and specifications as the case may be. The director may order that no further work be done until such compliance has been effected and approved by him. A failure to comply with the approval and approved plans and specifications as originally approved or as revised shall render the approval subject to revocation by the director, if compliance is not made in accordance therewith after notice and order from him as provided in this chapter.

§ 42-1716. Notice of completion — Filing of supplementary drawings or descriptive matter.

Immediately upon completion of a new dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure or enlargement or repair of a dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure the owner shall give notice of completion to the director, and as soon thereafter as possible file with the director supplementary drawings or descriptive matter showing or describing the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure as actually constructed, including the following:

A record of all grout holes and grouting.

A record of permanent location points and bench marks.

A record of tests of concrete or other material used in the construction of the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure.

Any other items which may be of permanent value and have a bearing on the safety and performances of the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure.

In connection with the enlargement or repair of a dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure, the supplementary drawings and descriptive matter need apply only to the new work.